Vermont, session 2025-2026, H574.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 33 V.S.A. § 3506 is added to read:
§ 3506. STOCK SUPPLY AND EMERGENCY ADMINISTRATION OF
EPINEPHRINE
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Designated personnel” means an employee or volunteer of a child
care provider who has completed training required by the Division and who
has been authorized by the child care provider to administer epinephrine in
VT LEG #386206 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.574
2026 Page 2 of 5
accordance with a health care professional’s standing order or protocol
pursuant to this section.
(2) “Epinephrine” means a U.S. Food and Drug Administration–
approved single-use epinephrine delivery system containing a premeasured
single dose of epinephrine.
(3) “Health care professional” means a physician licensed pursuant to 26
V.S.A. chapter 23 or 33, an advanced practice registered nurse licensed to
prescribe drugs and medical devices pursuant to 26 V.S.A. chapter 28, or a
physician assistant licensed to prescribe drugs and medical devices pursuant to
26 V.S.A. chapter 31.
(b)(1) A health care professional may prescribe epinephrine in a child care
provider’s name, which may be maintained in the child care facility for use as
described in subsection (d) of this section. The health care professional shall
issue to the child care provider a standing order for the use of epinephrine
prescribed under this section, including protocols for:
(A) recognizing whether an individual is experiencing a potentially
life-threatening allergic reaction;
(B) administering epinephrine to an individual experiencing a
potentially life-threatening allergic reaction;
VT LEG #386206 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.574
2026 Page 3 of 5
(C) caring for an individual after administering epinephrine,
including contacting emergency services personnel and documenting the
incident; and
(D) disposing of used or expired epinephrine.
(2) A pharmacist licensed pursuant to 26 V.S.A. chapter 36 or a health
care professional may dispense epinephrine prescribed to a child care provider.
(c) A child care provider may maintain a stock supply of epinephrine. A
child care provider may enter into arrangements with epinephrine
manufacturers or suppliers to acquire these products for free or at reduced or
fair market prices.
(d) The child care provider may authorize appropriately trained designated
personnel to:
(1) administer prescribed epinephrine to a child according to a plan of
action maintained in the child’s health records on file with the child care
provider; and
(2) administer epinephrine, in accordance with the protocol issued under
subsection (b) of this section, to a child or other individual at a child care
facility if the designated personnel believes in good faith that the child or
individual is experiencing anaphylaxis, regardless of whether the child or
individual has a prescription for epinephrine.
VT LEG #386206 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.574
2026 Page 4 of 5
(e) Designated personnel, a child care provider, and a health care
professional prescribing epinephrine to a child care provider shall be immune
from any civil or criminal liability arising from the administration of
epinephrine under this section, unless the person’s conduct constituted
intentional misconduct. Providing or administering epinephrine under this
section does not constitute the practice of medicine.
(f) The Division, in consultation with the Department of Health, shall adopt
rules pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 for managing children with life-
threatening allergies and other individuals with life-threatening allergies who
may be present at a child care facility. The rules shall:
(1) establish protocols to prevent exposure to allergens in child care
facilities;
(2) establish procedures for responding to life-threatening allergic
reactions in child care facilities, including postemergency procedures;
(3) implement a process for child care providers and the parents or
guardians of children with a life-threatening allergy to jointly develop a written
individualized allergy management plan of action that:
(A) incorporates instructions from a child’s health care professional
regarding the child’s life-threatening allergy and prescribed treatment;
(B) becomes part of the child’s health records maintained by the
child care provider; and
VT LEG #386206 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.574
2026 Page 5 of 5
(C) is updated annually;
(4) require education and training for child care providers and
designated personnel, including training related to storing and administering
epinephrine and recognizing and responding to a life-threatening allergic
reaction; and
(5) require each child care provider to make publicly available protocols
and policies developed in accordance with the rules adopted by the Division
under this section.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386206 v.1